Utah statutes.
63A-1-102.   Purposes.
The department shall:
(1)  provide specialized agency support services commonly needed;
(2)  provide effective, coordinated management of state administrative
services;
(3)  serve the public interest by providing services in a cost-effective and
efficient manner, eliminating unnecessary duplication;
(4)  enable administrators to respond effectively to technological
improvements;
(5)  emphasize the service role of state administrative service agencies in
meeting the service needs of user agencies;
(6)  use flexibility in meeting the service needs of state agencies; and
(7)  protect the public interest by insuring the integrity of the fiscal
accounting procedures and policies that govern the operation of agencies and
institutions to assure that funds are expended properly and lawfully.
